New Mexico, session 2026, HB333.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. Section 41-7-1 NMSA 1978 (being Laws 1955, Chapter 50, Section 1) is amended to read: "41-7-1. LIMITATION OF TORT ACTIONS FOR LIBEL, SLANDER OR INVASION OF PRIVACY--DAMAGES RECOVERABLE.-- A. No person shall have more than one cause of action for damages for libel, [or] slander, [or] invasion of privacy or any other tort founded upon any single publication, [or] exhibition or utterance, such as any one edition of a newspaper, [or] book or magazine or any one presentation to an audience, [or] any one broadcast over radio or television or any one exhibition of a motion picture. Recovery in any action shall include all damages for any such tort suffered by the plaintiff in all jurisdictions. B. A prevailing defendant in an action for libel, slander, invasion of privacy or other tort based on a single publication, exhibition or utterance may recover damages, treble damages and reasonable attorney fees and costs from the plaintiff if the action was based on a publication, exhibition or utterance by the prevailing defendant that is: (1) made without malice; (2) factually true; and (3) regarding an incident of sexual assault, sexual harassment or unlawful discriminatory practice as provided in Section 28-1-7 NMSA 1978 that was experienced by the prevailing defendant." - 2 -